Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WALKER WEST MUSIC ACADEMY.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Walker West Music Academy for a series of 12 free concerts, youth and adult music education, professional development for music educators, and community choir programs. new text end